Louisiana, session 2026, SB170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3158 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3158. Creation of commission; membership; qualifications; tenure
A. There is hereby created a commission to be known as the Caddo-Bossier
Parishes Port Commission. It shall be composed of nine members who shall:
(1) serve Serve without compensation, as follows:.
(2) Be appointed subject to Senate confirmation.
(3) Have expertise in economic development, transportation, logistics, or
commercial real estate.
B.(1)(a) Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing
authority of the parish of Caddo as follows:
(i) One of the commissioners shall reside in the parish of Caddo outside of
the city limits of Shreveport.
(ii) One of the commissioners shall reside in the parish of Caddo within the
city limits of Shreveport.
(b) Any commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall serve a term
of six years.
(2) One of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing authority
of the parish of Bossier.
(a) The commissioner shall reside in the parish of Bossier.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 170 ENROLLED
(b) The commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall serve a term
of six years.
(c) The commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph may serve
a maximum of two consecutive terms.
(3) Four of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing authority
of the city of Shreveport as follows:
(a) Three commissioners shall reside within the city limits of Shreveport and
each shall serve a term of six years and may serve a maximum of two consecutive
terms.
(b) One commissioner shall be at-large and reside within the city limits of
Shreveport and shall serve a term concurrent with the term of the mayor.
(4)(a) Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing
authority of the city of Bossier City.
(b) Any commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall reside
within the city limits of Bossier City and shall serve a term of six years.
(c) The commissioners appointed pursuant to this Paragraph may serve
a maximum of two consecutive terms.
B.C. A vacancy on the commission for any reason shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments and for the unexpired term of office. Each
commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and a qualified voter and
property taxpayer of the parish of Caddo or Bossier, as the case may be, and of the
state of Louisiana.
C.D. The governing authorities, in making appointments, shall endeavor to
provide for racial diversity of the board and to ensure that the racial proportion of the
appointees shall reflect the same racial proportion of the geographical area which
they represent. Except, the governing authority of the parish of Caddo, in making
appointments, shall endeavor to provide for racial diversity of the board and to
ensure that the racial proportion of their appointees shall reflect the same racial
proportion of the governing authority of the parish of Caddo.
D.E. The term of each commissioner serving on June 18, 2006, shall expire
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 170 ENROLLED
as follows:
(a) The term of the commissioner appointed by the governing authority of the
parish of Caddo shall expire on June 30, 2007. His successors shall be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of Item (A)(B)(1)(a)(i).
(b) The term of the commissioner appointed by the governing authority of the
parish of Bossier shall expire on February 15, 2009. His successors shall be
appointed pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (A)(B)(2).
(c) The term of the commissioners appointed by the governing authority of
the city of Shreveport shall expire as follows:
(i) The term of the commissioner whose term began on April 1, 2003, and
would have expired on June 28, 2011, shall expire on such date. His successors shall
be appointed pursuant to the provisions of Subparagraph (A)(B)(3)(a).
(ii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on March
31, 2007, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to the
provisions of Item (A)(B)(1)(a)(ii).
(iii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on July
26, 2007, shall expire on June 30, 2007. His successors shall be appointed pursuant
to the provisions of Subparagraph (A)(B)(3)(a).
(iv) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on July
27, 2009, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to the
provisions of Subparagraph (A)(B)(3)(a).
(v) The commissioner whose term began July 18, 1997, and would have
expired on June 28, 2011, shall serve a term concurrent with the term of the mayor
who appointed him. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of
Subparagraph (A)(B)(3)(b).
(d) The term of the commissioners appointed by the governing authority of
the city of Bossier City shall expire as follows:
(i) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on March
29, 2012, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to the
provisions of Paragraph (A)(B)(4).
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 170 ENROLLED
(ii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on
February 16, 2007, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (A)(B)(4).
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.